Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Legislative Retirement System, Chapter 513-3-1.

47-6-70.
Creditable service.

The creditable service of a member shall include all established creditable prior service and service as a member of the General Assembly since he last became a contributing member of the system, in respect to which he makes contributions to the system. It shall also include, in the case of a member who became such on July 1, 1967, and remained a contributing member of the system continuously thereafter until his death or his retirement under the system or until he otherwise separates from service.

Any member who has prior service as a member of the General Assembly rendered after July 1, 1967, for which creditable service under this retirement system has not been obtained shall receive creditable service for such prior service subject to the following conditions and requirements:

The prior service as a member of the General Assembly must have been rendered while the member was a contributing member of either this retirement system or the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia;

Employee contributions made by the member during the period of such prior service must not have been withdrawn by the member; and

Creditable service obtained under this subsection shall be applicable only to the Georgia Legislative Retirement System and shall have no application whatsoever to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or to any rights retained under that retirement system pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 47-6-42.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1476, § 2.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

Code Commission notes.

It appears that language which was intended to follow the word “include” in the second sentence of subsection (a) was omitted from Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 5.

47-6-70.1.
Prior service credit for military service.

Any member who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during any period when a military draft was in effect and who was honorably discharged from military service may receive prior service credit under this chapter for such active duty military service subject to the following conditions and requirements:

This Code section shall apply only to those members who have eight or more years of creditable service under this chapter;

Prior service credit for military service under this Code section may be obtained under a ratio of one year of credit for military service for each five years of creditable service, not considering creditable service under this Code section, or, for military service of less than a full year, under a ratio of credit for one month of military service for each five months of creditable service;

No prior service credit for military service may be obtained under this Code section if credit for such military service has been or may be obtained under any other provision of this chapter;

No prior service credit for military service may be obtained under this Code section if such military service has been or may be used in the determination of the member’s eligibility for retirement benefits or allowances under any other state retirement or pension system, any retirement or pension system of a political subdivision, or any federal retirement or pension program, except social security and those retirement programs covered under Public Law 810, 80th Congress, as amended;

The total amount of prior service credit for military service may not exceed five years for all military service which is creditable as prior service under this chapter; and

The member must pay to the board of trustees the regular employee contribution provided by subsection (a) or (a.1) of Code Section 47-6-60 based on the amount of such contributions that were required and in effect at the time the military service was rendered plus interest on such employee contributions at the rate of 7 percent per annum compounded annually from the time the military service was rendered until the date of payment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-6-70.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1856, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 218, § 3/HB 824.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “provided by subsection (a) or (a.1) of Code Section 47-6-60 based on the amount of such contributions that were required and in effect” for “of 7 1/2 percent of compensation based on the compensation received by members of the General Assembly during legislative sessions” in paragraph (6).

U.S. Code.

Public Law 80-810 is the Army and Air Force Vitalization and Retirement Equalization Act of 1948 (See

10 U.S.C. § 8010

et seq.).

47-6-70.2.
Reestablishment of creditable service by current members who ceased being members of General Assembly and who withdrew retirement contributions.

Any current member who had previously ceased to be a member of the General Assembly and who withdrew accumulated contributions from the retirement system pursuant to Code Section 47-6-85 may reestablish as creditable service the total creditable service possessed by the member at the time of such withdrawal of accumulated contributions by paying to the board of trustees the amount of accumulated contributions which were withdrawn plus regular interest on such amount compounded annually from the date of the withdrawal of such contributions to the date of payment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-6-70.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 534, § 1.